Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1154
Legislative districts; change; when operative.

The changes made to this section and section 50-1153 by Laws 2021, LB3, One Hundred Seventh Legislature, First Special Session, shall become operative on October 1, 2021. The members of the Legislature from the even-numbered districts shall be nominated at the primary election in 2022 and elected at the general election in November 2022 for the term commencing January 4, 2023. The members of the Legislature elected or appointed prior to October 1, 2021, shall represent the newly established districts for the balance of their terms, with each member representing the same numbered district as prior to October 1, 2021.

Laws 1981, LB 406, § 52;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 5-252;

Laws 1991, LB 614, § 52;

Laws 1992, LB 946, § 1;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 7;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 15, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 852, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 50-1152;

Laws 2011, LB703, § 3;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 2.